District of Columbia statutes.
47-1095

SeVerna, LLC, Lot 247, Square 621.

[Not funded].

History

Mar. 11, 2015, D.C. Law 20-209, § 2(b), 61 DCR 12727

Editor's Notes

Applicability of D.C. Law 20-209: Section 4 of D.C. Law 20-209 provided shall apply upon the inclusion of its fiscal effect in an approved budget and financial plan, as certified by the Chief Financial Officer to the Budget Director of the Council in a certification published by the Council in the District of Columbia Register.